Tennessee, session 114, SB0655.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 8-7-106(b), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(6) Upon the consent of the district attorney general of any other judicial district,
specially appoint another district attorney general, or an assistant to that district attorney
general, to conduct specific proceedings under chapter 47 of this title, regarding removal
of officers, which the district attorney general is authorized by law to conduct in that
district.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0655
000934
- 1 -